Utah statutes.
78B-5-810.   Sureties on stay bonds entitled to subrogation.

If a surety on an appeal executed to stay proceedings upon a money judgment pays the judgment, either with or without action, after its affirmance by the appellate court, the surety is subrogated to the rights of the judgment creditor, and entitled to control, enforce, and satisfy the judgment in all respects as if the surety had recovered the same.

